Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216B.2431] CERTIFICATE OF NEED; ENERGY DEMAND FORECASTS; PETROLEUM PIPELINES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Application" means an application for a certificate of need filed under section 216B.243 to construct a pipeline that transports crude oil, motor fuel, or other refined petroleum products. new text end new text begin (c) "Calendar day" means a measure of daily refinery capacity that adjusts for typical operating conditions, including downtime for maintenance. new text end new text begin (d) "Consumer" means a person that purchases a motor fuel or other refined petroleum product from a retailer to utilize or otherwise consume the energy contained in the motor fuel or other refined petroleum product. new text end new text begin (e) "Contiguous states" means the states of Iowa, North Dakota, South Dakota, and Wisconsin. new text end new text begin (f) "Demand" means the quantity of motor fuel or other refined petroleum products from the applicant's facilities that consumers in Minnesota and in contiguous states are willing and able to purchase. Demand includes any resulting quantities placed in the applicant's interim storage facilities. new text end new text begin (g) "Electric vehicle" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 26a. new text end new text begin (h) "Forecast period" means the 15 consecutive years following the year in which an application is filed. new text end new text begin (i) "Fuel efficiency" means the distance a motor vehicle is capable of traveling on one gallon of motor fuel. new text end new text begin (j) "Motor fuel" means a liquid fuel derived from petroleum and used to propel a motor vehicle. Motor fuel does not include casinghead, absorption, condensation, or natural gasoline, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin (k) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 42. new text end new text begin (l) "Other refined petroleum product" means a product, other than motor fuel, produced from crude oil at a refinery. new text end new text begin (m) "Refinery" means a facility that processes crude oil into motor fuel and other refined petroleum products. new text end new text begin (n) "Remote work" means an employment construct in which employees work from a location other than the place of employment one or more days per week. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin This section applies to an applicant seeking a certificate of need for a pipeline that transports crude oil, motor fuel, or other refined petroleum products. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Demand forecasts; motor fuel. new text end new text begin (a) An application must contain separate annual demand forecasts for motor fuel from consumers for each year of the forecast period: new text end new text begin (1) in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) in contiguous states. new text end new text begin (b) The forecasts required under paragraph (a) must be derived from the following factors using separate forecasts for each year of the forecast period: new text end new text begin (1) population; new text end new text begin (2) vehicle miles traveled, which must consider trends in remote work, mass transit ridership, and vehicle miles traveled reduction targets established in the statewide multimodal transportation plan under section 174.03, subdivision 1a; new text end new text begin (3) fuel intensity and efficiency of motor vehicles using motor fuel; new text end new text begin (4) penetration rates of electric vehicles, which must consider federal and state financial incentives for vehicles and charging stations; new text end new text begin (5) specific capacity expansion plans proposed by a refinery designated to receive crude oil supplies from the proposed pipelines; and new text end new text begin (6) world crude oil prices and crude oil prices from the proposed pipeline's supply sources and the impact of prices on demand from consumers. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of the forecasts and data under paragraphs (a) and (b), the applicant must specify underlying assumptions, including a narrative description of how changes in the assumptions may affect the findings under paragraphs (a) and (b), with respect to: new text end new text begin (1) crude oil prices in the United States, in Canada, and globally; and new text end new text begin (2) changes in crude oil transportation infrastructure out of Western Canada and into or out of Minnesota and contiguous states. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Demand forecasts; other petroleum products. new text end new text begin (a) The application must contain separate annual demand forecasts for other refined petroleum products from consumers for each year of the forecast period: new text end new text begin (1) in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) in contiguous states. new text end new text begin (b) The demand forecasts required under this subdivision must be derived from forecasts of the factors influencing consumer demand for each product. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to an application for a certificate of need for a petroleum pipeline filed with the Public Utilities Commission on or after that date. new text end